
African Quality African Quality African Quality 
Rating MechanismsRating MechanismsRating Mechanisms
(AQRM)(AQRM)(AQRM)

An Internal Quality Assurance Tool
For Higher Education Institutions
An Internal Quality Assurance Tool
For Higher Education Institutions
(A HAQAA2 Initiative)

Olusola Oyewole Olusola Oyewole Olusola Oyewole 





                                                             

African Quality 
Rating Mechanisms
(AQRM)

An Internal Quality Assurance Tool

For Higher Education Institutions

(A HAQAA2 Initiative)

Olusola Oyewole 
    



ii OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

About the HAQAA2 Initiative

The HAQAA2 initiative has been an ambitious endeavour to promote African 
continental harmonization in quality assurance, as well as African regional 
integration in higher education more generally, in line with the ambitions of the 
‘PAQAF’ framework of the African Union and the Continental Education Strategy 
for Africa (CESA). 

A continuance of HAQAA1, the initiative has been adjusted and re-positioned 
over the past 3 years, responding and adapting to the Covid crisis and tackling 
new, important policy themes where required. The initiative has been structured 
around three core action areas: Capacity building, training and support for CESA 
(the policy component). 

It has engaged diverse stakeholders from the higher education sector at institutional, 
country and regional levels. The final HAQAA2 event is a showcase event, tying 
together all of these elements. 

The objectives are: 

•	 Promote and disseminate the results of training and capacity building done 
in IQA and EQA

•	 Discuss the future of the African Standards and Guidelines (ASG-QA) on 
this basis, as well as continued capacity building and training needs

•	 Present a road map and clear vision for the future set-up of the Pan-
African Quality Assurance and Accreditation Agency, according to a major 
stakeholder consultation

•	 Present a road map for capacity building for coherent higher education 
data generation in Africa

•	 Present a road map for how the African Credit Transfer System should 
be taken forward in Africa, and concrete actions that can be taken at 
institutional, national and regional levels



iiiAFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

•	 Discuss the overall policy impacts of HAQAA2, both towards African 
regions and towards the African Union and the CESA agenda. 



iv OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

About the Association of African Universities 

(AAU)

The AAU, whose headquarters is in Accra, Ghana, was established in 1967. The 
AAU is the apex organization and principal forum for consultation, exchange of 
information and cooperation among the universities and other higher education 
institutions in Africa. With an initial membership of 34 institutions in 1967, AAU 
has grown to a current membership of more than 420 institutions in 46 African 
countries, and operates in three official languages, namely English, French and 
Arabic. 

As the representative voice of higher education in Africa, AAU aims to raise the 
quality of higher education in Africa and strengthen its contribution to Africa’s 
development by, inter alia, providing support to their core functions and facilitating 
critical reflection on, and consensus building around, issues affecting higher 
education and the development of Africa. 

As a key higher education body with a continental mandate, the AAU has a unique 
voice on matters of higher education in Africa. This has motivated development 
partners to support it in its programmes and services in areas such as - ICT, Gender, 
Climate change, health, quality assurance, youth education, peace building, 
advocacy, centres of excellence and new research paradigms. 

Motto

The Voice of Higher Education in Africa.

Vision

To be the leading advocate for higher education in Africa, with the capacity to 
provide support for its member institutions in meeting national, continental, and 
global needs.

Mission

To enhance the quality and relevance of higher education in Africa and strengthen 
its contribution to Africa’s development. 



vAFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Foreword

The African Quality Rating Mechanisms (AQRM) is a tool that higher education 
institutions in Africa can employ to ensure the quality of their programs and 
processes. It was adopted by the Conference of the African Union Ministers of 
Education in 2007. In 2018, the African Union Commission handed over the 
AQRM questionnaire to the AAU, but it was realized that an overhaul of the whole 
instrument was inevitable. The instrument was re-developed by the AAU and 
the launch of the African Quality Rating Mechanism (AQRM) for institutional 
improvement was done on Friday June 3rd 2022, with an overwhelming response 
from the whole world. 

The AQRM was promoted as part of the Harmonization of African Quality 
Assurance Program 1 and 2, during which its contents were improved to take care 
of emerging issues in higher education, post covid.

The HAQAA2 program was able to develop an 0n-line version of the AQRM 
so that institutions can complete the questionnaires on their own for an online 
analysis.

This tool has been found to be a useful tool for driving institutional internal quality 
assurance process. Issues about the validations of the institutional self-analysis has 
been raised. However, institutions are challenged to raise up internal validation 
teams to check on themselves. The AQRM tool can be used by any institution or 
by a unit or department or college in an institution. Its current version is to ensure 
that institutions can promote it to a wider use in their environment.

Olusola Oyewole. PhD.
Secretary-General,
Association of African Universities.



vi OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Acknowledgment

The contributions of various staff of the African Union Commission and the 
Association of African Universities to this document is highly appreciated. While 
it will not be possible to mention all, special recognition needs to be made to 
the contributions of Dr Beatrice Njenga, Prof. Peter Okebukola, Prof. Olusola 
Oyewole, Prof. Jonathan Mba, Dr Violet Makuku, Ms. Nodumo Dhlamini among 
others.

The special support of the OBREAL Global, Barcelona, Spain for this publication 
is appreciated.



viiAFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Table of Contents

About HAQAA2  ... ... ... ... ... ... ... ... ii

About AAU  ... ... ... ... ... ... ... ... iv

Foreword  ... ... ... ... ... ... ... ... v

Acknowledgment  ... ... ... ... ... ... ... ... vi

Chapter 1 Quality and Quality Assurance of Education  ... ... 1

Chapter 2 Introduction to the African Quality Rating Mechanism 
 (AQRM) for Higher Education ... ... ... ... 15

Chapter 3 The Guide for the Use of the African Quality Rating 
 Mechanism ... ... ... ... ... ... ... 19

Chapter 4 Frequency and Grading for the Rating System ... 22

Chapter 5 Standards and Guidelines for the Internal Quality 
 Assurance in AQRM ... ... ... ... ... ... 24

Chapter 6 The AQRM Tool ... ... ... ... ... ... 40

Chapter 7 Rating Questionnaires ... ... ... ... ... 61





1AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Chapter 1

Quality and Quality Assurance of Education

1.1 Quality

Quality is a multidimensional concept that has different meanings for different 
people and situations. “Quality” as a concept has been variously recognized to 
mean:

•  “fitness for purpose’ – measured by the extent to which each higher 
education product fits its envisaged or stated purpose.

•  ‘fitness of purpose’ – measured by the extent to which an institution’s 
provisions align with or fit national priorities, goals, objectives, and 
aspirations.

•  ‘transformation from one state to another with value-added’.

•  ‘attainment of a flawless product’

•  ‘excellence’ - is viewed as the attainment of exceptionally high standard.

•  ‘attainment of exceptionally high standards’ among others.

•  ‘conforming to generally accepted standards as defined by an institution, 
quality assurance bodies, and appropriate academic and professional 
communities”1.

•	 the totality of features and characteristics of a product or service that bear 
on its ability to satisfy given needs or value to the Customers 

Quality has become an integral feature of the education system all over the world, but 
the concept of ‘quality education’ has different meanings to the various stakeholders 
in the education field. Njoku2 noted that academics will define quality in higher 
education by emphasizing the quality of research work done by a colleague or an 

1 Materu Peter (2007) Higher education quality assurance in sub-Saharan Africa. World Bank Working 
Paper No. 124. The World Bank.

2 Njoku, P. (2006) Quality assurance in higher education. Paper presented at the 30th Annual Conference 
of the Nigerian Association for Education Administration and Planning, held at the Enugu State 
University of Science and Technology, Enugu, Nigeria. 2-6 October, 2006. 15 pages



2 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

institution, while undergraduate students will focus on the issue of teaching, their 
learning experience, and the environment, while professional bodies will focus on 
meeting the professional standards and skills.

In another World Bank publication,3 several reasons were given for prioritizing 
educational quality over quantity at higher levels of education. Countries were 
encouraged to promote quality education because:

•  Quality is more closely correlated with growth. Workers with higher 
quality cognitive, technical, communications, and team skills are better 
able to: assimilate technology; push the knowledge frontier; work in 
groups; and make efficient decisions that build the technological capacity 
for competitiveness and are the basis for innovation in applied research in 
fields such as engineering and the biosciences.

•  Tertiary institutions equipped to impart quality education and conduct 
relevant applied research are also likely to cultivate multiple linkages with 
industry and to stimulate knowledge-based development through a variety 
of proven channels.

•  Better quality education can lead to lower graduate unemployment and 
enable graduates to effectively participate in lifelong learning.

•  One of the strategies for arresting the deterioration of the past and 
revitalizing higher education systems in Africa is by promoting quality in 
higher education and the process of quality assurance.

The current need for development in many African countries demands that they 
produce graduates that are able to stimulate innovation, promote the development 
and diversification of new services and products and maximize returns through 
more efficient allocation and management of assets. This can only be possible when 
educational institutions of learning -  from the primary to the tertiary education 
levels,  are committed to quality education.

It is necessary to promote quality education at all levels of the education system. 
This is because poor quality primary education will lead to poor quality raw 
materials for the secondary schools, which will also deliver poor quality students 
into the tertiary levels for graduates that will be useless to themselves and society. 

3 World Bank (2008) Accelerating Catch-up: tertiary education for growth in sub–Saharan Africa. 
Synopsis. Pg 7



3AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Africa needs quality education that will produce skilled and innovative graduates to 
support national as well as continental economic development.

The strategy that education institutions employ to ensure or ascertain the quality of 
their education system is called Quality Assurance.

1.2 Quality Assurance:

Quality assurance  is variously recognized to include:

•  “the process of evaluating the fitness for purpose of an institution or program 
using appropriate measurements, which examines the effectiveness and 
efficiency of the inputs, process and output elements of the institution’s set 
purpose and mandates against some standards.

•  “process of ensuring that minimum standards (or requirements) are in 
place, adhered to and improved upon, on a regular basis”.

•	 “all those planned or systematic actions necessary to provide adequate 
confidence that a product or service will satisfy given needs” (Making sure 
that Quality is what it should be)

1.2.1 Quality Assurance in Education

One of the areas where the concept of Quality Assurance is emphasized is in higher 
education.

From Higher Education Perspective, quality assurance is the process of examining 
an institution and its facilities and programmes to see if the expected standards are 
being met, upheld, and improved upon. It is a process where the basic requirements 
for infrastructure, teaching and learning, staff development, research, student 
affairs, and programme design and development are examined by an organized and 
systematic assessment process. 

Quality Assurance in education is the “planned and systematic review process of 
an institution or programme to determine that acceptable standards of education, 
scholarship, teaching, administration and infrastructure are being maintained and 
enhanced.



4 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

The aim of quality assurance in higher education is to guarantee the improvement 
of standards and quality in higher education in order to make higher education 
meet the needs of students, employers and financiers.

1.2.2 Driving Forces Compelling Quality Assurance

There are various driving forces compelling the need for good quality assurance 
mechanisms in our education system. These include:

1.2.2.1 Demand for efficiency and competitiveness:

The role of education and training and of high-level human resource development 
in addressing the political and economic crises and challenges of the African 
continent are also central to the recommendations of the Commission for Africa 
and to the commitments in the Gleneagles Communique.

A well functioning and responsive higher education system is now considered by 
many governments and international development and funding agencies to be 
indispensable for social and economic development and for the establishment of 
knowledge-based societies and economies.

African higher education institutions will have to accelerate the development 
of their planning and delivery capacity to respond to and be ready for the new 
challenges and tasks facing them within the emerging development assistance 
framework. The development and maintenance of quality and standards will be 
a critical component of higher education readiness on the continent – as a factor 
designed to improve efficiency, benchmarking, and competitiveness in higher 
education. Several new developments pertaining to the increased demand for higher 
education, new modes of delivery and the increasing mobility of students and 
academic professionals across national borders are all impacting on African higher 
education institutions in ways that require stronger quality assurance planning and 
implementation capacity.

1.2.2.2 Increasing Mobility, Globalization and the Cross–Border Recognition 
of Qualifications:

Increasing student and academic staff mobility across borders has put the issue of 
mutual recognition of academic and professional qualifications high up on the 
agenda of higher education systems.



5AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Cross-border recognition of qualifications and joint accreditation of degrees and 
diplomas are not new to the African continent, and various sub-regional bilateral 
and multilateral mechanisms have been in place for some time to facilitate these 
processes, e.g., in East Africa by the Inter-University Council, in Southern Africa by 
a Technical Committee of the Southern African Development Community and for 
the French-Speaking African Countries by the Conseil Africain et Malgache pour 
l’Enseignement Superieur (CAMES). However, there is a broad understanding that 
the existing international and regional initiatives on quality assurance, accreditation 
and recognition of qualifications have to be further strengthened and implemented 
more effectively. In the context of increasing and new forms of cross-border provision 
of higher education, and the wide range of possibilities opened by the inclusion of 
education in the General Agreement on Trade in Services (GATS), there is a need 
for new regional and international initiatives to enhance student protection at a 
global level, while respecting individual countries’ authority to regulate the quality 
assurance and accreditation of their own higher education systems. This move calls 
for more collaboration between domestic higher education service providers and 
international organisations and networks on quality assurance to enable African 
providers and their country systems to have a clear picture of the accreditation and 
recognition regimes of countries outside the continent and of the latest trends and 
developments in this regard.

1.2.2.3 Involvement of private interests in higher education:

New private higher education providers are emerging in many countries of Africa. 
For some of them, financial returns come up as the main motivating factors. 
Except urgent steps are taken, there will be tendencies to compromise academic 
standards by these private providers. This may be expected as some of these 
providers themselves may not have benefits of higher education and may want to 
cut corners. The current news of the on-goings in private universities of Nigeria 
lend credence to these assertions. Private Universities which are yet to produce first 
degree holders are currently mounting post-graduate programmes; professors are 
being appointed with lowers academic qualifications and experiences; the rate of 
turnovers of vice-chancellors is alarming with a university having up to two or three 
vice-chancellors within a year. It is becoming clear that without adequate quality 
assurance mechanisms in place, the marketability of graduates from these private-
higher education systems may be discriminated against in the future.



6 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

1.2.2.4 The Challenge of the New Modes of Delivery:

The world of education and learning is rapidly changing and creating new realities 
and challenges in the face of globalisation. The knowledge society, innovations 
in ICT, emphasis on the market economy, massification of education provision 
and participation, and trade liberalisations have important implications for higher 
education and lifelong learning. New contextual issues such as electronic delivery 
of educational services, cross-border delivery and consumption of educational 
services, skills development outside formal learning arrangements, new types of 
qualifications, and even commercial provision of teaching and learning continue 
to challenge existing institutions, policies, funding arrangements and regulatory 
frameworks in many countries. 

These recent developments also pose new questions for the regulatory capacities and 
boundaries of existing national or regional policy frameworks. Furthermore, the 
current situation increases the pressure to make new efforts for student protection 
both at national as well as international levels.

1.2.2.5 Expansion in Enrolments:

Institutions of higher education are under increasing pressure to admit more 
students than the capacity of their staff and infrastructure will allow, resulting in 
phenomenal increases in enrolment at almost all institutions of higher education 
at a time when resources for staffing, equipment, library and laboratory facilities 
are still limited, if not shrinking. Although the increase creates opportunity for 
services and production to be provided by highly skilled and creative personnel, 
nurturing such a cadre of people requires that the quality of higher education has 
to be strengthened. 

The issues of quality in labour market terms are measured not only by traditional 
input-oriented approaches to quality assurance, but increasingly by outcomes-
oriented and competency-based approaches. How the products of these institutions, 
be they graduates, research products or technical services, are perceived and received 
in the relevant communities, is therefore of increasing importance.

Despite the problems posed by structural adjustment requirements and various 
other political and social crises, African higher education has always sought to 
respond to the demands for increased access. With increasing demand, institutions 
of higher education have come under pressure to attract more students by promising 



7AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

and delivering high quality programmes. However, these developments are new to 
many African institutions of higher education that are yet to develop strategies for 
resource mobilisation and academic entrepreneurship. As many universities try to 
offer more than their human and other resources can cater for, quality is likely to 
be compromised. This is especially problematic in a context where African public 
and private universities may have to compete with foreign providers operating in 
their countries.

1.2.2.6 Market Demand for Quality and Relevance of Education

We are moving very fast into the era where the end-users of the products of higher 
education are demanding for relevance and the need for special skills from the 
products of these institutions. Today, it is not enough to hold a certificate, it is 
important to be able to exhibit the skill to carry out some services. Higher education 
institutions therefore need to ensure that their Inputs, Processes and Outputs 
meet the required quality levels through the implementation and institution of 
appropriate quality assurance programmes.

1.2.2.7 The Challenge of Brain–Drain

It is estimated that about 3 million Africans live in Europe and North America. 
Over one hundred thousand are professionals. The World Bank reported that 
23,000 university graduates and 50,000 executives leave Africa annually. Estimates 
show that 40,000 African PhD holders live outside Africa. 

There are arguments that the phenomenon of ‘brain-drain’ can be made to be 
beneficial as the skilled and highly qualified professionals can put their capacities to 
the service of their home nations, which may benefit from emigrants’ remittances, 
export opportunities for technology, transfer of knowledge, increased ties to foreign 
institutions and access to international networks. The great skills of African youths 
will not need to emigrate outside the continent in search of quality education if 
such quality education is provided in their various countries.

One important way of retaining our human resources is by improving their working 
environment at home and ensuring that our home students do not receive second-
rate education.



8 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

1.2.2.8 Challenge of Emerging Trans-National Education:

Many young people are now looking beyond the four walls of tertiary institutions 
to get the education, skills, and competencies that they need. This new form of 
education is being provided by Transnational education.  Transnational Education 
refers to “all types of higher education study programmes, or sets of courses of study, 
or educational services; including those of distance education, in which the learners 
are located in a country different from the one where the awarding institution is 
based”. Transnational education is currently being fuelled by globalization and the 
hunger for life-long learning by many citizens of the world. The recent emergency 
of Covid-19 has gone long enough to expose many young people who are hungry 
for education to get connected to various forms of transnational education. The 
delivery mechanisms for Transnational education are wide and include:

a) Branch campus / Satellite campus.

b) Franchising

c) Articulation

d) Distance – (Non-Open) /virtual education / Self-study distance education

e) Study abroad

f ) Double/ Joint degree / Programme articulation

g) Corporate Universities

h) Off-shore institution

i) International joint university Programme

Many national and international organizations do not know the attitudes they 
should have towards transnational education. While many developed countries 
are currently making money from less developed countries through transnational 
education, many African countries are yet to develop appropriate mechanisms to 
control it, if they regulate it to their benefit.

While some countries are seeing it as a threat to the national monopoly of their 
national authorities, some others are seeing its potential to improve access, widen 
participation, enrich the curricula, expand choice and flexibility and impact 
some skills and competencies that are not available in many traditional tertiary 
educational institutions. 



9AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

One major challenge is that the providers of such tertiary education are not 
educational institutions like universities, but commercial entities, such as Coursera, 
who are empowering young people with the skills of this current century.

Beyond these, they are posing challenge to the need to ensure that the quality of 
transnational education meets the standards sets in each country.

1.2.2.9 The Challenge of the Pandemic:

The Covid-19 pandemic has changed the face of higher education in many 
continents. Following the pandemic, the face-to-face mode of teaching and learning 
will need to give room to virtual teaching and learning. Many institutions have been 
struggling to provide the necessary infrastructure for the need to conduct learning 
through the virtual space. Today, examinations, practical exercises, research and 
other activities are being facilitated virtually. There is need to ensure that the quality 
of these modes of delivery meet up to the standards set for such programmes.

1.3 Quality Assurance Comprehensive Approach:

The process of Quality Assurance varies with the purpose of the exercise. There 
are Quality Assurance programmes aimed at assessing a partial aspect of a system, 
without checking the totality of the system. This partial approach will have no 
lasting effect at promoting total quality, as needed for the current challenge.

Okebukola (2006)4 proposed a comprehensive approach to quality assurance, 
which focus on the dimensions of INPUTS, PROCESS, and OUTPUTS (As 
in Figure. 1). This is a “Critical Control Point” mechanism of carrying assuring 
quality. In this model, it is assumed that where the inputs  (human and material 
resources and or capital materials) are of quality standard and quality processes are 
followed, the outputs will be of commensurate good quality. The components that 
are assessed in this comprehensive model constitute the substance of most quality 
assurance tools and mechanisms.
 

4 Okebukola, P (2006) Quality Assurance in Nigeria. UNESCO Conference on Quality Assurance in 
Africa. Nairobi, Kenya. February, 2006



10 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Figure 1 : Quality Assurance of What?. (Okebukola, 2006)

1.4  Quality Assurance Process:

For a nation to put in place good quality assurance mechanisms for her educational 
system, the following are necessary:

(a) Quality Assurance ‘Institutionalized’ Structures. 

These refer to the recognized body, unit or agency empowered to ensure that laid 
down quality assurance mechanisms are set up and adhered to. 

The institutionalized structure could exist at the national level, regional, professional 
or even continental level. Such a structure or organ should have the necessary 
authority by law to set standards, benchmarks, to meet laid down criteria and have 
the power to ensure compliance, through appropriate monitoring and control 
mechanisms and power to sanction appropriately to ensure compliance.

(b) Quality Assurance Mechanisms

This refers to the process through which the quality is ascertained. In most 
educational institutions, minimum academic standards or benchmarks are set 
for the various components of the institution, programmes or courses. Today 
the Benchmarks are now giving way to Core Curriculum Minimum Academic 
Standards (CCMAS). The concept of the CCMAS sees the national regulatory 
agencies providing a percentage of the curricula that should be mounted for each 



11AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

discipline and making room for the institution to provide additional institutionally 
developed courses, in line with their mission and vision.

Mechanisms are put in place for institutions to carry out their level of compliance 
with these standards through a process called “Institutional Self-Assessments” 
(the use of evaluation concepts, techniques, and findings to foster improvement and 
self-determination), or through an external review system, which is usually carried 
out by an independent qualified team that is usually composed of representations 
of the stakeholders of the programme or system (such as senior professionals in the 
field, industries, professional bodies, students, etc).

(c) Quality Assurance Guidelines: 

These are the set of assessment procedures laid down for assessing the quality of a 
programme or institution. The criteria are usually those components that make up 
the inputs, process and outcomes/ products, which had earlier been highlighted.

(d) Quality Assurance Evaluation/review process/ Assessment

Mechanisms and Process – Self-assessment, programme evaluation, audit, 
institutional assessment/ accreditation, etc.

(e) Quality Assurance Communication, Advocacy, and Publicity.

Quality is not ensured until the stakeholders are made to know the ratings of their 
interests in the quality assurance rating mechanisms. Appropriate community and 
dialogue with the institutions on what   needs to be done to meet set standards 
and communication of the outcomes of quality assurance exercise in an open and 
transparent manner helps to ensure the quality of the process as well as the quality 
assessment agency or unit itself.

1.5 Systems of Quality Assurance:

There are two major types of Quality Assurance systems based on the purpose of 
the process and the authority carrying out the quality assurance process.

Basically, the two systems are:



12 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

1. External Quality Assurance Processes

2.  Internal Quality Assurance Processes

1.5.1 External Quality Assurance:

This External Quality Assurance process is the one carried out by an external body, 
usually, a regulatory agency or an international quality assurance organisation. This 
process is carried out for various purposes including:

(a)  Assessment related to the initial opening of programmes and institutions.

(b)  Quality supervision through the setting of minimum academic standards 
for different fields of studies, and Minimum Institutional Standards.

(c)  Accreditation of academic programmes and institutions. Accreditation is 
a process of self-study and external quality review used in higher education 
to scrutinize an institution and or its programmes for quality standards and 
the need for quality improvement. There can be   programme accreditation 
or institutional accreditation.

Programme accreditation is the process whereby specific programmes such 
as medicine, history, law or engineering offered in an institution are evaluated 
relative to minimum standards set for that programme. The programme is deemed 
accredited if the minimum standards are met or exceeded.

Institutional accreditation on the other hand is a process by which the activities 
of an institution are evaluated against criteria established by  an accrediting agency. 
These criteria include governance and administration, financial stability, admissions, 
personnel services, institutional resources, student academic achievement, 
institutional effectiveness, and relationships with constituencies inside and outside 
the institution. Institutional accreditation speaks to the overall quality of the 
institution without making judgments about specific programmes. Attention is 
given not only to the educational offerings of the institution being evaluated, but 
also to such other institutional characteristics as adequacy of library and learning 
resources, student personnel services, financial conditions, effective management, 
and administrative strength. Educational programmes are reviewed as a part of 
consideration of the entire institution, but not in great detail. The five key features 
of institutional accreditation are:



13AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

•  Self-study: Institutions prepare a written summary of performance based 
on the standards set by the accreditation agency.

•  Peer review: Accreditation review is conducted primarily by teaching, 
administrative and technical staff of similar institutions.

•  Site visit: The accreditation organization sends a visiting team to review 
the institution.

•  Action (judgment) of accreditation organization: Accrediting 
organisation makes decisions about the accreditation status of the 
institution.

•  Monitoring and oversight: Institutions are reviewed over time in cycles 
from every few years to ten years. Normally, these reviews include a site visit.

(d)  Programme or institutional “Audit” and “Academic Review”. Apart from 
Accreditation, other tools that are commonly employed in assessing the 
quality of educational programmes and institutions are “Audit” and 
“Academic Review”.

Audit is a process of review of an institution or programme to determine if its 
curriculum, staff, and infrastructures meet its stated aims and objectives. It is an 
evaluation of an institution or its programmes in relation to its own mission, goals, 
and stated standards.

An Academic Review is a diagnostic self-assessment and evaluation of teaching, 
learning, research, service and outcomes based on a detailed examination of the 
curricula, structure, and effectiveness of a programme as well as the quality and 
activities of its faculty. It is designed to give an institution an evaluation of its own 
academic programmes based on a self-assessment by the unit, a peer review by 
colleagues outside the programme, and a report on its findings.

(e)  Harmonization and recognition of degrees and diplomas from other 
sources.

(f )  Ranking of Universities and programmes

1.5.2 Internal Quality Assurance

Internal Quality Assurance (IQA) is also referred to as Internal Quality Monitoring, 
Internal Audit, Internal Quality Review, University Quality Audit, etc.,



14 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Internal Quality Assurance (IQA) is the process through which an institution carries 
out a quality assurance process within its system with the purpose of ensuring that 
it is delivering excellent services.

Internal Quality Assurance (IQA) is a general term for the methods and procedures 
used by institutions to review, evaluate, and/or assess the quality of the education 
offered and/or of the research conducted, the services offered, etc. 

The objective of Internal Quality Assurance is for institutions to create their own 
system that is best suited to their own environment and characteristics, to give 
them assurance that they are meeting the required standards, and expectations.

Institutions commit to internal quality assurance not because of meeting the 
demands of a regulatory agency but for them to have the satisfaction that they 
are meeting the expectations and delivering good services to their stakeholders 
which include Students, parents, employers, governments, sponsoring agencies, 
development partners, the industries and the community.

One of the tools for carrying out a good internal quality assurance process is the 
African Quality Rating Mechanism (AQRM)



15AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Chapter 2

Introduction to the Quality Rating Mechanism 
(AQRM) for African Higher Education

2.1  Introduction

Quality assurance of higher education institutions (HEIs) is being promoted as 
part of an initiative aimed at revitalizing higher education and research in Africa. 

To contribute to quality assurance, the African Union Commission (AUC) is 
spearheading the development of an African Quality Rating Mechanism (AQRM) 
to provide an objective measure of quality in African higher education institutions 
(HEIs). 

The AQRM includes criteria against which institutions can assess their own 
quality levels. It is designed to assist institutions to benchmark progress in quality 
development, in every area of education provision and research. This will also feed 
into the Commission’s unfolding efforts towards the enhancement of harmonization 
of higher education in Africa. 

2.2 Purpose

The purpose of the African Higher Education Quality Rating Mechanism is to 
present an alternative to the existing global ranking/rating systems that do not take 
into consideration African specificities. 

The quality rating mechanism seeks to support processes to improve quality 
in African higher education by developing African specific quality criteria or 
benchmarks and supporting the development of institutional cultures of quality. 
This will, over time, contribute to successful implementation of the AU Higher 
Education Programmes (HEP) Harmonization Strategy as it is likely to pave the 
way for increased partnership between African HEIs. Ultimately, the mechanism 
should support African higher education to compete more favourably in an 
increasingly international higher education environment. 



16 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

The existence of a quality rating mechanism, specifically relevant to the African 
higher education context, will also support the AUC in its endeavours to identify 
Centres of Excellence across the continent. 

2.3 Level of Analysis

While quality can be assessed at various units of analysis (programme, 
department, faculty, and institution), The programme and institution level of 
analysis are the focus of the AQRM

The institutional and programme selected for assessment are shown in Table 1, 
while some samples of issues addressed under the criteria are presented in Table 2

Table 1: Institutional and Programme Criteria

Institutional Criteria Program Criteria

Governance and management Management

Financial resources Financial resources

Infrastructure Infrastructure

Recruitment, admission and selection Recruitment, admission and selection

Teaching and Learning Teaching and learning

Research output Research output

Student support Student support

Engagement with the community/broader 
society Engagement with community/broader society

Staff characteristics Staff characteristics

Student characteristics Student characteristics

Throughput rates Throughput rates

Quality assurance procedures Curriculum development



17AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Table 2: Sample Issues

Criteria Sample issues

Governance And Management

1. The institution has a clearly stated mission and values 
with specific goals and priorities

2. The institution has specific strategies in place for mon-
itoring achievement of institutional goals and identifying 
problem areas.

Infrastructure

1. The institution has sufficient lecturing spaces to accom-
modate student numbers, taking the institutional mode of 
delivery into account.

2. The institution provides sufficient learning/studying 
space for students, including access to electronic learning 
resources, as required for the institutional mode of delivery

Finances

1. The institution has access to sufficient financial resources 
to achieve its goals in line with its budget and student unit 
cost.

2. The institution has procedures in place to attract fund-
ing, including from industry and the corporate sector.

It is hoped that institutions will take ownership of their own quality assurance 
processes, in line with policy and procedures of national and regional quality 
assurance bodies and use the quality rating mechanism as one means of supporting 
continuous quality improvements. Should institutions and/or programmes 
maintain an ‘Excellent’ quality rating for at least four years, they will be considered 
for recognition as ‘AU Centres of Excellence’. 

2.4 Rating Institutional quality 

For each specific criterion, there are five possible scores:  From 0 to 4

With:

0 = Poor

1 = Insufficient

2 = Satisfactory

3 = Good

4 = Excellent



18 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Institutions will be free to score themselves using these 5-point scores and their 
various scores under each category will help them to appreciate their rating on the 
specified criterion.

2.5 Overview of the Process

The African Higher Education Quality Rating Mechanism is voluntary. The quality 
rating mechanism will be implemented in partnership with regional and national 
higher education bodies. 

Institutions will work with relevant national higher education bodies to prepare their 
quality rating submission. To avoid duplication and to support the development 
of national quality assurance processes across the continent, as far as possible this 
process should be aligned with national quality assurance procedures. 

A team of two or more people could be appointed within each participating 
department unit or programme. Their role will be to process the submission, 
calculate the institutional programme rating and prepare a narrative report 
detailing areas of strength and areas for improvement. Once completed, the rating 
and narrative report will be sent to the coordinating team, who will conduct the 
final review and verification. It is proposed that a team of five people are appointed 
with responsibility for managing and marketing this quality rating process at a 
continental level. 



19AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Chapter 3

The Guide to the Use of the African Quality 
Rating Mechanism

PREAMBLE

The use of the AQRM instrument which supports the work of national, regional, 
and continental Quality Assurance (QA) bodies was adopted by the Conference of 
the African Union Ministers of Education in 2007. The African Union Commission 
(AUC) was at the forefront in the development of this African QA improvement 
tool that will ensure that the performance of higher education institutions can be 
measured against a set of agreed criteria. 

This exercise is meant to help institutions carry out self-evaluations that support 
institutional quality culture development. Most African Higher Education 
Communities, including regional Quality Assurance agencies (QAAs), national 
and some individual institutions throughout all the 5 African regions took part in 
the development process of the African Standards and Guidelines (ASG-QA). This 
was out of a realization by African countries’ Higher Education Ministers that QA 
(Standards & Guidelines as well as Accreditation) is the most important tenet for 
revitalizing African higher education. 

The implementation of the AQRM aims at fulfilling the main aim of the 2014, 
Addis Convention which is to enhance student and staff mobility through enabling 
the comparability of qualifications through the use of the same standards and 
improvement tool. 

The AQRM supports African higher education institutions to take ownership of 
their own quality assurance processes and it is one means of supporting institutional 
quality.  Secondly, this exercise enables individual institutions to improve their 
internal quality assurance systems in order to compete favourably at different levels 
of higher education ranking systems throughout the world. 

This exercise brought about the harmonization of African Higher Education 
QA and accreditation whose importance was noted by African countries higher 
education ministers during the then Organization of African Unity (OAU) in 



20 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Arusha, Tanzania, 1981 when they came up with the 1981, Arusha Convention. 
The importance of this convention which was not implemented for many years was 
clearly illustrated by its revival under the 2014, Addis Convention which AAU as 
the African Union Commission’s implementing arm will now execute through the 
AQRM on a larger scale in 2018. AAU is also the “Voice of Higher Education in 
Africa”.

Purpose of the AQRM:

The AQRM institutional evaluation is meant for institutional improvement. It is 
not a ranking tool, but it helps institutions to 

a)  improve 

b)  build the quality culture

c)  prepare for the 5-year cycle of re-accreditation and 

d)  compete favorably in the ranking systems of their nations, continent and at 
global level.

Guide to the Process

1.  The Institution or unit that wants to apply the AQRM tool must understand 
the purpose of the exercise.

2.  Absolute honesty is required for this self-assessment tool.

3.  The User needs to note that the instrument is not useful for a one-time 
application. Its merit is derived in making multiple analyses using the tool 
and assessing progress or otherwise, in various units, activities and processes 
analyzed using the AQRM

4.  It is advisable that institutions carry out the AQRM exercise every three 
months and be able to map their progress or otherwise in ensuring quality.

5.  An Institutional team should be set up, for checking on the issues raised in the 
Questionnaire.

6.  The Institutional team should carry out an on-site visit to the various aspects 
covered in the Question and complete the questionnaire by assessing the state 
of things as it pertains to the institution.



21AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

7.  An Internal or External Verification team can be set up to verify the various 
claims made by the Internal AQRM team.

The processes in 6 and 7 should be repeated every three months.

8.  The outcomes of the multiple verifications should be communicated to the 
institution’s management and areas that need to be attended to should be 
brought to the attention of the management to ensure the quality of the 
programmes and processes.

How institutions can use the online AQRM tool

An online version of the AQRM is available, which can serve the same purpose as 
the current hard copy.

1.  Interested universities are asked to fill out this ONLINE APPLICATION 
FORM: at http://aqrm.aau.org

2.  The commitment (of the university leadership) as expressed in the application 
form, as well as preparedness to undertake the exercise are very important 
aspects for a successful AQRM institutional assessment and evaluation. The 
AQRM Questionnaire can be accessed through this link: https://aqrm.aau.
org The AAU is looking forward to your expression of interest to undergo the 
AQRM institutional evaluation with a component of an external QA review 
from the AAU. 



22 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Chapter 4

Frequency And Grading For The Rating 
Process

To be able to use and benefit from the objectives of the AQRM tools, you should 
be ready to carry out the rating mechanisms at least once in three months. And 
you should be able to do this about 4 times to be able to assess your performances. 

The AQRM will help you to monitor your status or ratings in each of the following:

1. Governance and Management – Including Vision, Mission and Strategic 
Objectives 

2. Human Resources 

3. Infrastructure and Facilities 

4. Financial Resources

5. Teaching and Learning

6. Research, Publications, and Innovations

7. Community and Societal Engagements

8. Programme planning and Management

9. Curriculum development

10. Teaching and learning

11. Assessment

12. Programme / Academic Results

13. Digitalization, Technology-aided / Virtual learning

14. Library Facilities



23AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

The first AQRM exercise that an institution will conduct will have no meaning 
beyond telling you about your status on each of the criterion.

After the first assessment, the institution or unit should identify some proactive 
actions that need to be taken in areas where they have scored low. Necessary actions 
should be taken to address them.

In another three months, the institution / unit will need to subject itself to another 
AQRM process. This will help you, not just to know your rating but will help you 
to know if you are improving or deteriorating. 

The AQRM is not a Ranking tool. There is therefore no need to compare your 
rating against any other institution or unit.

As earlier indicated, you will be rating the activities or academic roles using each 
specific criterion, with five possible scores:  From 0 to 4

With:

0 = Poor

1 = Insufficient

2 = Satisfactory

3 = Good

4 = Excellent

For you to be able to rate your institution, you need to know the Standards for 
comparism. The standards for comparism on your rating in the AQRM is the 
African Standards for Quality Assurance in Higher Education (ASG-QA).

All the team members involved in the rating process must therefore know the 
expected standards for each of the criteria. It is for this purpose that this standard 
is provided in the next Chapter.



24 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Chapter 5

Standards and Guidelines for Internal Quality 
Assurance in AQRM

Introduction:

The African Quality Rating Mechanisms has adopted the African Standards and 
Guidelines (ASG-QA) as complementary tools for its internal quality assurance 
processes.

5.1 Vision, Mission and Strategic Objectives

Standard

The institution shall have published vision and mission statements that reflect its 
commitment to continuous quality enhancement; strategic objectives and clear 
policies and procedures that are consistent with its vision and mission. 

Guidelines

The institutional vision, mission, and strategic objectives:

a) Are publicly disclosed; reflect the aspirations and needs of stakeholders, 
and indicate strategic development plans and targets. 

b) Concerning QA, are translated into clear policies and strategic plans, 
which are operationalised into achievable goals.  

The institution ensures that there is a robust and well-functioning QA system 
for its entire activities (academic, research and community engagement), and that 
facilitates the coordination of the approval of policies, procedures and mechanisms. 
The institution, therefore, ensures that:

a) The vision and mission statements and strategic objectives reflect 
commitment to quality enhancement;

b) Various forms of planning (for example, strategic, institutional, academic, 
and financial) are coordinated to ensure the quality of academic outcomes; 



25AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

c) Medium- and long-term plans reflect the programmes being offered, as well 
as its research focus to ensure sustainability and continuous improvement;

d) The formulation of the plans is collegial, they promote a high degree of 
institutional integrity and responsiveness to change, and they are known 
to stakeholders; and

e) There is continuous and periodic monitoring, evaluation and benchmarking 
of processes, including self-assessment of academic programmes and 
institutional self-assessment for purposes of continual improvement.

5.2 Governance and Management

Standard

The institution shall have clearly stated governance and management structures. 
This will ensure sound and ethical governance and management, including robust 
QA practices that support the achievement of its mission and legal mandate.

Guidelines

The institution: 
a) Has qualified, competent and experienced leadership to oversee the 

development and management of a quality culture within the institution;
b) Has relevant governance and management bodies, such as the University 

Council, Senate, Management Board, Student Body; and various 
committees, each with a clear mandate, duties, responsibilities, powers, 
privileges and tenure; and these bodies are properly coordinated to ensure 
efficiency, effectiveness and quality;

c) Has a QA policy and structure, which flow down through all levels;
d) Has clear communication systems and networks for the promotion of 

internal and external information dissemination for public accountability;
e) Makes responsible use of its autonomy; 
f ) Has policies and procedures for the delegation of authority, whenever 

needed; 
g) Enables students to participate in decision-making in relevant governance 

bodies;
h) Ensures regular consultations with stakeholders, reports and follows up 

actions on key issues of policy and operations to promote quality, cohesion, 
harmony and identity within the institution;



26 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

i) Emphasises ethics, transparency, and academic integrity throughout its 
teaching, learning and research activities;

j) Promotes a high degree of institutional integrity and responsiveness 
by advocating and demonstrating honesty and non-discrimination in 
its treatment of staff, students and members of the public and in the 
management of institutional affairs;

k) Publishes and disseminates on a regular basis, impartial and objective 
qualitative and quantitative information about courses offered, research 
undertaken and community services;

l) Has developed and implemented effective processes for deterring, detecting 
and dealing with misconduct by students or staff;

m) Has policies and activated procedures to manage conflict of interest; and 
n) Has effective, systematic, timely and fair processes for the investigation of 

complaints, grievances and appeals by students, staff and other stakeholders.

5.3. Human Resources

Standard

The institution shall have policies on human resources that are inclusive, and that 
ensure recruitment and retention of adequate numbers of qualified and competent 
staff to achieve its mission and carry out its legal mandate.

Guidelines

The quality of staff is the key to the quality of the higher education institution and, 
therefore, it: 

a) Has clear policies and procedures that ensure equal opportunities and 
actual gender equality in human resources for recruitment, retention, and 
promotion of staff that is based on qualification, competence and skills;

b) Has a core of full-time staff and keeps up-to-date records of staff numbers, 
qualifications and employment turnover rates;

c) Has clear policies and procedures for continuous staff development;
d) Has clear contractual agreements with staff that outline the conditions 

of employment and are aligned with any legislative requirements of the 
country of the institution;

e) Provides adequate staff support facilities and services;
f ) Undertakes periodic monitoring, evaluation, and appraisal of staff; and



27AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

g) Adheres to (local/regional) norms for student-faculty ratios that promote 
student-centred learning.  

5.4 . Financial Resource Management 

Standard

The institution shall have adequate financial resources and prudent financial 
management that are aligned to its mission, objectives and mandate to ensure 
quality education.

Guidelines

Financial sustainability is the backbone of any institution, and adequate financial 
resources and prudent financial management should be conducted within an 
approved framework of institutional strategies, policies and procedures, which 
enable the institution to meet its financial needs to ensure quality academic 
outcomes. The institution has:

a) Adequate financial resources to carry out its mandate and objectives 
effectively and efficiently;

b) A diversified financial and sustainable resource base, and ensures a balanced 
allocation of resources to core functions of teaching and learning, research, 
and community engagement;

c) A prudent financial management system, which includes strategies, 
policies and procedures for budgeting, resource allocation, repairs and 
maintenance of infrastructure, asset management, debt management and 
financial reporting;

d) A system to address the risks, gaps and challenges identified for continuous 
improvement; and

e) Monitoring, evaluation (through financial audits) and benchmarking 
processes for the financial management system using international best 
practices or some other basis of accounting appropriate for the institution.

5.5. Infrastructure and Facilities 

Standard

The institution shall have adequate and appropriate infrastructure, facilities and 
resources to support teaching, learning and research. 



28 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Guidelines

For a good higher education experience, institutions provide a range of resources 
to assist students’ learning. 

Infrastructure and facilities are in line with the goals and aims of the higher 
education institution, the programmes on offer, the teaching and learning strategy, 
as well as research. 

The institution has:
a) Academic, administrative and recreational facilities (lecture theatres, 

seminar rooms, staff offices, laboratories, studios, workshops, etc.) adequate 
for the number of students and staff;

b) A properly organised library equipped with facilities and resources (physical 
and/or electronic); adequate for the number of students and staff;  

c) Adequate Information and Communication Technology (ICT) 
infrastructure, including affordable, high speed and dedicated connectivity. 

d) Facilities that conform to appropriate national health and safety provisions; 
and

e) Facilities accessible for persons with disabilities. 

In the case of E-learning, the institution ensures: 
a) Sufficient infrastructure to address technical support in terms of:

i. Server space,
ii. Redundancy or load balancing,
iii. Technical help desk,
iv. Reliable internet access, and
v. Reliable technical services in terms of back-up and remote services; 

and 
vi. Resources to develop the knowledge and skills of their ICT 

practitioners.

b) That it has an ICT plan for purposes of:
i. Maintaining and upgrading of technologies; and
ii. Ensuring reliability, privacy, safety and security.

c) That there is consistency and coherency of the technical framework for 
students and academic staff, which ensures that any change in technology 
is introduced in a way that minimises its impact on students and academic 
staff. Therefore, the institution has:



29AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

i. A clear structure for communicating changes in software programmes, 
hardware or technical system / procedure when a student or staff 
proceeds from one course to another,

ii. A training programme / process for both staff and students when new 
software or a new system is adopted,

iii. Access to training by off-campus or virtual students, and 
iv. Learning policy on new software when a student or tutor proceeds 

from one course to another.

d) That hardware, software and technical support are an important element 
of e-learning and, therefore, the institution has the following in place:

i. A help desk that operates 24 hours and 7 days a week,

5.6. Student recruitment, Admission, Certification and 
Support services

Standard 

The institution shall have pre-defined, published and consistently applied 
policies and procedures that ensure fair and equitable recruitment and admission, 
progression, certification and support services through all phases of the student’s 
lifecycle, and in issues concerning students’ future employability.

The institution shall have documented policies and strategies that promote 
students’ welfare and guidance in curricular, vocational and personal areas.

Guidelines

Providing conditions and support that are necessary for students to make progress in 
their academic career is in the best interests of the individual students, programmes 
and institutions. It is vital to have fit-for-purpose admission, recognition and 
completion procedures.

Therefore, the institution has clear guidelines and strategies:
a) For marketing/promoting the institution and its programmes, recruitment, 

admission, selection and registration;
b) That promote diversity in admission, including gender mainstreaming and 

consideration of disadvantaged groups and persons with disabilities, where 
applicable;



30 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

c) That ensure that students admitted meet minimum general and 
programme-specific entry requirements;

d) That ensure monitoring, evaluation and benchmarking for improvement 
of enrolment management; 

e) That guarantee continual collection and compilation of data on students’ 
admission, progress and performance, and graduation rates;  

f ) That promote student retention and progression, and address issues 
concerning drop-out rates;

g) That ensure rigorous processes for issuance and storage of certificates; and
h) That ensure storage of detailed records and transcripts, indicating the list 

of courses, units and grades.

The needs of a diverse student population (such as mature, part-time, employed 
and international students as well as students with disabilities) and the shift 
towards student-centred learning and flexible modes of learning and teaching, are 
taken into account when allocating, planning and providing learning resources 
and student support.

Support services may be organised in a variety of ways depending on the institutional 
context. However, the internal quality assurance ensures that all resources are fit-
for-purpose, accessible, and that students are informed about the services available 
to them.

Students need guidance, and appropriate provision is made to advise and assist 
them in curricular, vocational and personal domains. Adequate provision is made 
for information and advice to potential students during the application and 
enrolment phases. 

The institution has guidelines for the promotion of students’ learning by:
a) Advising them on academic issues;
b) Advising them on financial matters;
c) Providing health and personal counselling services; and 
d) Providing career guidance. 

The institution supports and develops appropriate strategies for the creation and 
functioning of cultural, artistic and sports facilities and associations.  



31AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

5.7. Design, Approval, Monitoring and Evaluation of Study 
Programs

Standard

The institution shall have policies and systems that ensure the design and 
development, monitoring and evaluation of quality, relevant study programmes 
that are learning outcomes-based and aligned with the needs of stakeholders; and 
that contribute to the achievement of its mission, and are commensurate with 
national, regional and international standards.

In the case of ODL, the provider shall have in place mechanisms for pre-testing or 
piloting the learning materials to ensure that they are at the learners’ level and that 
the learners will be able to use them without difficulty. 

Guidelines

The institution:
a) Has policies, procedures and processes for introducing new programmes 

with learning outcomes and that are competence-based, and for amending 
or phasing out standing programmes and programmes are subject to 
continuous monitoring and evaluation (including periodic external review) 
and development to ensure currency, quality and relevance; 

b) Has academic programmes that are in line with its mission and objectives 
and address the expectations and needs of stakeholders; therefore, the 
programmes show range, depth, coherence, quality and relevance; are up 
to date and adequate in content and scope, promoting core content, ideas, 
values and the acquisition of employability skills, such as work-related 
learning/attachment/ internship/traineeship;

c) Ensures that programme structures and credit hours/units are in accord 
with international norms for the amount of study required for each 
qualification it offers (or for the level of the qualifications awarded); 
and that programmes are approved by the relevant national QAA and 
professional bodies, where applicable; 

d) Has effective mechanisms for stakeholder participation in curriculum 
design, review and validation, including feedback from students, alumni 
and employers; 

e) Has policies requiring formulated learning outcomes to be defined 
and documented for all programmes and courses, and ensures that the 



32 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

programme specifications are accessible to learners (or stakeholders);
f ) Has structures and procedures for the approval of programmes by relevant 

bodies, such as the Senate, and authorities such as professional bodies, if 
applicable;

g) Has programmes that are delivered by adequate, qualified and competent 
staff with pedagogical skills; 

h) Has appropriate formal agreements for all programmes offered in 
partnership with other institutions, specifying in detail the roles and 
responsibilities of both partners, including teaching commitments and 
QA arrangements; and

i) Ensures that the formulated learning outcomes are benchmarked against 
level descriptors of national or regional Qualifications Frameworks, as 
applicable. 

In the case of ODL, the pre-testing of learning materials is essential for ensuring that 
the learners will be able to achieve the objectives or intended learning outcomes. 
The broad requirement of pretesting should be made available, for example:

a) Students’ understanding of the objectives; 
b) Language of presentation;
c) Explanation of concepts, ideas and theories;
d) Use of examples for illustration;
e) Activities and practice exercises given, and feedback provided;
f ) Use of symbols or icons;
g) Navigational devices for online materials;
h) Motivate and sustain learners’ interests; and
i) Use didactic concepts in writing modules.

5.8. Teaching, Learning and Assessment

Standard

The institution shall put in place, in a way that is consistent with its vision 
and mission, policies and procedures that promote learning and acquisition of 
appropriate knowledge, competencies and skills; and assure fair and transparent 
assessment based on student-centred assessment. 



33AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

The assessment principles, standards and procedures are explicit and made available 
publicly to both students and staff.

Guidelines

Teaching and learning is one of the core activities of a higher education institution, 
and it is important that the academic staff and facilitators ensure quality student 
experience to enable the students to acquire appropriate knowledge, competences 
and skills.

The institution ensures that:
a) The teaching, learning and assessment strategies are student-centred and 

flexible; motivate students’ self-reflection and engagement in the learning 
process;

b) The environment and resources are appropriate and adequate to support 
each student;

c) There are systems in place for periodic monitoring, assessment and evaluation 
of the teaching and learning approaches for quality improvement; and

d) There are mechanisms for students to provide feedback on their learning 
experience.

In the case of ODL: 
e) The decision on the medium or media of delivery should take into account 

the following:
i. Accessibility to the learners,
ii. Cost of using it, both by the institution at installation and maintenance, 

as well as learner cost,
iii. Teaching strengths in relation to specific content,
iv. Its capacity in creating inter-activity, 
v. Organisational requirements for development,
vi. Its novelty, and
vii. Speed within which it can be set up.

f ) There are face-to-face sessions to provide general orientation and  
  introduction to the course materials at the commencement of the course;
g) There are special face-to-face sessions for difficult aspects of the course 

during the programme/course; and 
h) There are face-to-face sessions to provide some revision work to learners  

before examinations.



34 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Student assessment is one of the most important elements of higher education 
because the outcomes of such assessment have a profound effect on students’ 
progression and future careers. It is, therefore, important that assessment is carried 
out professionally at all times. This implies that:

a) The assessment and procedures are published and consistently applied, and 
include:

i. A range of assessment methods (e.g. coursework, 
projects, research, dissertation and examinations to 
serve formative and summative assessment purposes), 

ii. Internal and external moderation,
iii. Invigilation procedures,
iv. Monitoring of student progress,
v. Validity and reliability of assessment practices,
vi. Recording of assessment results and settling of disputes, 

and 
vii. Rigour and security of assessment system;

b) Assessment standards are spelled out for each programme and are competence- 
or outcomes-based, where applicable;

c) Assessment is carried out by competent and impartial examiners; 
d) Integrity of examinations and award of degrees are ensured to guard against 

examination malpractice; 
e) There is regular objective feedback to students on their strengths and 

weaknesses, and appropriate counselling support for improvement;
f ) There is a disciplinary and appeals process for students who may feel aggrieved; 

and
g) There is a QA handbook, which is known to staff and students.  

5.9 Research and Innovation 

Standard

The institution shall encourage, promote, and engage in innovative research 
consistent with its policies and strategic plans, and address national, regional, 
continental, and international needs. The institution shall encourage innovation 
in its teaching, learning and research.



35AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

The institution shall ensure that the management of postgraduate studies is 
conducted within an approved framework of institutional policies and plans that 
ensure quality ethical research. 

Guidelines

Research is one of the core activities of a higher education institution, and 
the institution therefore requires an institution-wide research policy that sets 
the direction of its research. The policy is at both institutional and research-
programme level (postgraduate studies) to ensure proper engagement in research. 
The institution ensures that:

a) There is a shared understanding of the nature, role and goals of research;
b) There are standards, procedures and processes for the approval of research 

proposals, and theses, and the conduct and supervision of research studies;
c) There are policies, research management systems and strategies, adequate 

infrastructure and resources that facilitate all staff to undertake innovative 
research, and publish research results;

d) There are standards and processes for the approval of research proposals and 
theses, in line with the research needs of the national or regional context, 
and capacity building possibilities for researchers, management of research 
partnerships and research contracts, handling of intellectual property and 
commercialisation of research, and effective and trustworthy management 
of research information;

e) There is adequate academic integrity through the establishment and use of 
appropriate research committees and boards to ensure academic integrity; 

f ) The research undertaken is relevant and responsive to the needs for 
academic advancement and community development expectations; and

g) There is effective monitoring and evaluation of the research system. 

5.10. Community engagement 

Standard

The institution shall encourage engagement in community outreach 
programmes as part of its social responsibility.  



36 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Guidelines

A higher education institution is not only responsible for teaching, learning and 
research, but also for serving society. The institution ensures that community 
engagement activities are conducted within institutional policies and strategies that 
facilitate collaboration between the institution and its larger communities (local, 
national, regional, continental and global) for the mutually beneficial exchange of 
knowledge and resources in a context of partnership and reciprocity. 

For the benefit of the students, institution, and society, the institution incorporates 
community engagement in its activities, with the objective of:

a) Enriching scholarship, research, and creative activities; 
b) Enhancing teaching and learning; 
c) Facilitating preparation of educated and engaged citizens; 
d) Strengthening democratic values and civic responsibility in students; 
e) Addressing critical societal issues and contribute to public good. 

The institution should ensure that there are mechanisms for partnering with other 
stakeholders in the community for sustainable development. 

5.11.   Information Management System

Standard

The institution shall ensure that it collects, analyses, and makes use of relevant 
information for the effective management of its programmes of study and other 
activities.

Guidelines

Reliable data is crucial for informed decision-making and for understanding 
what is working and what challenges need to be addressed. Effective processes 
for collecting and analysing information about academic programmes and other 
activities of the institution feed into the internal QA system.

The information gathered will depend on the vision and mission of the institution. 
However, the following points are important to address:



37AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

a) Key performance indicators;
b) Profile of student population (including gender);
c) Learning resources and available student services;
d) Student progression, drop-out rates, and graduation rates;
e) Satisfaction of students and alumni with programmes and teaching 

provided; and
f) Career paths for students.

It is important that both students and staff are involved in analysis and follow-up 
activities to address the shortcomings.

5.12. Public communication

Standard

The institution shall publish information about its activities, including programmes, 
in a clear, accurate and objective manner; and ensure that the information is up-
to-date and accessible.

The institution shall ensure that promotion of its programmes is carried out in a 
fair and ethical manner, following acceptable best practices, and comply with all 
relevant legislation.

Guidelines

Information about the institution’s activities is useful for prospective and current 
students, alumni and other stakeholders, and the public. The information 
includes programmes offered, selection criteria, expected learning outcomes, 
qualifications they award, teaching and learning procedures, graduation rates, 
learning opportunities, and information about the employment of its graduates. 
The institution and departments ensure that:  

a) Promotional materials give a clear and accurate view of the programme, its 
provision, objectives and outcomes, including:
i. Identification of the programme,
ii. The body awarding the qualification and its accreditation status, 
iii. Mode of delivery,
iv. Level of the programme on the National Qualifications Framework  

(NQF), where applicable,



38 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

iv. Charges involved,
v. Terms and conditions relevant to the programme,
vi. Conditions for withdrawal from the programme,
vii. Financial agreements with the provider; and 
viii. Rights, obligations and commitments expected of the student.

b) Students are fully informed of the issues that affect them with respect to 
the management of the programme, such as:

i. Language of communication, ii. Required access to technologies, in 
the case of ODL, iii. Technical competencies of students required to 
enrol in the programme, in the case of ODL,

iv. Timeframe in which the programmes are offered and nature of 
learning outcomes,

v. Required texts and access to reference materials,
vi. Understanding of independent learning expectations,
vii. Schedule for face-to-face interactions, in the case of ODL, 
viii. Schedule for examinations, 
ix.  Schedule for submission of assignments, and 
x.  Collection of certificates.

5.13. Collaboration, Staff and Student mobility 

Standard

The institution shall have mechanisms that promote collaboration with other 
HEIs, professional bodies, research institutions and relevant social actors at 
national, regional, continental and international levels and to facilitate mobility 
of students and staff.

Guidelines

The institution has policies that promote the mobility of academic staff, researchers 
and students in the programme, internationally. The degree-awarding institution 
ensures appropriate and high quality delivery of programmes at the partner 
institution. The collaborating institutions:



39AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

a) Ensure that programmes under collaboration are of the required standard 
and rigour as those of the parent institution;

b) Ensure that students benefit from the same standard of resources as those 
for the regular students of the awarding institution;

c) Take the responsibility to assure the quality of the educational provision 
under collaboration;

d) Ensure that the collaborating institutions are approved by the relevant 
QAA/ professional body and are subject to periodic quality audits; and

e) Ensure that students are fully informed of the nature of the collaboration 
between the institutions concerned.

If the programme is offered via collaborative arrangements, the provider clearly 
defines the rights and responsibilities of parties, legal ownership, accreditation 
status of the programme, and resources available for the programme.



40 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Chapter 6

THE AQRM TOOL

Lead and Contact Person

Lead and Contact Person for this survey 

Full Names:  ………………………………………………………………..

Position:        ………………………………………………………………..

Department: ………………………………………………………………..

Address:        ……………………………………………………………….

E-mail:          ………………………………………………………………..

Phone Number (including country code):  ……………………………….

1.00 Section 1: General Information / Unit/ Information

1. Name of Institution/ Unit

2. Any other Name of 
institution (e.g.  in original 
language

3. Acronym by which institu-
tion / Unit is known

4. Country 

5. Year of Establishment of 
Institution / Unit



41AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

6. Date Institution was formally 
accredited

7. Web Address

1.1 institutional profile

Q8. Which of the following fits the type of your institution? _________________

Status (Mark ‘X’ as appropriate)

Public

Private but not for profit

Private for profit

Other (specify)

Q9. At what levels are academic programmes offered

Levels (Mark ‘X’ as appropriate)

Undergraduate

Masters

Doctorate

Post Doctorate

Others (Please specify)



42 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Q10. How many colleges, faculties, schools, institutes, and departments has 
your institution?

Types (Please state the appropriate number)

Colleges

Faculties

Schools

Institutes

Departments

Other distinct units/specify

Q11. What is the thematic focus of your institution?

Thematic Focus (Mark ‘X’ as appropriate)

Science and Technology

Management and Business Administration

Arts, Languages and Humanities

Agriculture

Medicine

Other (Specify)...............................................................



43AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

1.2 student profile

Q12. What is the total current number of full-time and part-time students 
enrolled in your institution?

Degree Type Number of Male 
Students

Number of
Female Students

Total Number

Bachelors Full-time

Bachelors part-time

Masters full-time

Masters part-time

Doctorate full time

Doctorate part time

Others

Total

Q13. What is the age distribution of students in your institution?

Age Range (years) Male (%) Female (%)

Under 18

18 - 25

26 - 35

36 - 50

51 and above



44 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Q14. Do you charge tuition fees in your institution and if yes how much do 
you charge for the following categories of students on average? _____________

YES/NO
Amount (US$)

Undergraduate Postgraduate

All domestic students

Some domestic students

International Students

Others (Please specify)

Q15. Which of the following criteria are used for admission decisions in your 
Institution?

Criteria (Mark ‘X’as appropriate)

Performance on your institution’s standardized tests

Performance on national exams (e.g. Baccalaureate, A level 
etc.)

Cumulative high school grade average

Others (Please specify) (Ordinary Diplomas or National Certifi-
cate of Education @ Credit level C.G.P.A)



45AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Q16. What student services are offered by your Institution?

Service Type Mark X for those offered

On Campus Off Campus

Students Guidance and Counselling

Service Type Mark X for those offered

On Campus Off Campus

Student Loans Scheme
(Part-Payment scheme)

Scholarship and Bursary schemes

Canteens/Restaurants

On-Campus Residence

Organized Private Students Residence

Book Shop

Digital Library

Library

International Students Office

HIV/ Aids Counselling

Religious Chaplaincy

Others (Please specify)



46 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Q17. What proportion of students in your institution receive needs-based 
government or other financial assistance?

Type of Assistance
Proportion (%)

Government Source Other Source

Full Scholarship/Bursary

Partial Scholarship/Bursary

Loan

Others (Please specify)

1.3 facilities

Q18. How do you rate the condition of the following facilities in your 
institution? (Mark ‘X’ as appropriate)

Excellent Good Satisfactory Insufficient Poor

Science laboratories

Language Laboratories

Students Hostels

Staff Offices

Sports and Recreational 
Facilities

Others (specify)



47AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Q19. How would you rate the sufficiency of the following library and 
information resources available in your institution? (Mark X as appropriate)

Excellent Good Satisfactory Insufficient Poor

Journals /periodicals

Textbooks

Reference Materials

Internet access/ connectivity

Study space

Others (Specify)

Q20. What is your assessment of the e-learning services available in your 
institution? (Specify)

Please rate the items listed below (from 1 = weak to 5 = very strong)

Score

There is reliable, robust and adequate e-learning infrastructure - computer 
labs, internet access, learning management system

Processes associated with institutional planning and management of e-learning: 
- Financial resources are allocated for e-learning design, development and de-
livery - E-learning initiatives are guided by explicit plans, strategies and policies

Processes surrounding the oversight and support for e-learning: - Students re-
ceive adequate technical support when using e-learning resources - Teaching 
staff receive adequate technical support, pedagogical support and professional 
development opportunities

Processes concerning the creation and maintenance of e-learning resources: - 
Teaching staff are provided with e-learning design support services - There are 
formal e-learning standards and procedures

Processes impacting the pedagogical aspects of e-learning: - Students are 
trained on e-learning skills - Clear learning objectives guide the development 
of e-learning content - E-learning is designed to engage the students

Processes associated with the evaluation and quality control of e-learning: - 
The institution conducts regular reviews of e-learning aspects



48 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

a. Has your university begun implementing e-learning? (Mark X as appropriate)

Yes

In Progress

No

b. When did your university start implementing e-learning? (Mark X as 
appropriate)

Less than a year ago

A year ago

2 years ago

5 years ago

More than 5 years ago

c. What type of e-learning are you implementing? (Mark X as appropriate)

Fully online courses and programs

Blended learning

Other (specify)

d. Does the university have an e-learning policy? (Mark X as appropriate)

Yes

In Progress

No



49AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

e. Does the university have an e-learning strategy? (Mark X as appropriate)

Yes

In Progress

No

f. How is the e-learning project funded? (Mark X as appropriate)

Donors

Institutional Budget

Government

Other (Specify)

1.4 faculty / staff profile

Q21. State the number of your academic staff by qualification and gender

Rank Male Female Total

PhD

Masters

Bachelors

Diploma

Other (specify)

Total



50 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Q22. Approximately what proportion of the regular staff hold PhD? (Tick)

a) Less than 25% □

b) 25 - 50 % □

c) 51 - 75 %
 

d) More than 75% □

Q23. What is the proportion of your academic staff by rank and gender?

Rank Male Female Total

Professor

Associate Professor

Senior Lecturer

Lecturer

Emeritus Professor

Others (Specify)

Total



51AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Q24. What is the average annual gross salary (in US Dollars) of the following 
faculty members?

RANK
Average Annual Salary

(Local Currency)
Average Annual Salary

(USD)

Professor

Associate Professor

Senior Lecturer

Lecturer

Assistant Lecturer

Teaching Assistant

Emeritus Professor

1.5 governance and management

Q25. Describe the governance structure of your institution? Upload the 
organogram/ describe

Q26. How are the Vice Chancellors and Rectors of your institution appointed?

Mark ‘X’ as applicable

Appointed by the Government / Proprietor

Elected by Governing Council

Open competitive process

Others (Specify)



52 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Q27. How are the Deans of your institution appointed?

Mark ‘X’ as applicable

Appointed by the Vice-Chancellor/ Rector

Elected by their Peers

Through open competitive electioneering

Through interview following advertisement

Others (Specify)

Q28. Does your institution have a policy on the following issues

Policy Issues Yes No
Under 

preparation

Distance Education

Quality Assurance

HIV/AIDS

Partnership with Industry

Research

Religious tolerance

Academic Freedom

Staff Recruitment/ Retention/ Promotion

Harmonization of qualifications with other institutions and 
regions

Students/Staff with disability

Code of Student Conduct

Gender

Sexual harassment

Other Policies (Specify)



53AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Q29. Is your institution currently involved in inter-university academic 
mobility programmes? Indicate thematic areas and number of  institutions 
involved

No
Name of
Programme

Thematic
Areas of study

Number of African 
institutions involved

Number of Non-
African
Institutions involved

1

2

3

4

5

1.6 teaching and learning

Q30. Which of the following were used for evaluating student performance in 
your institution over the past three years?

TYPE OF ASSESSMENT FREQUENCY COMMENTS

Quiz

Homework

Term paper

Projects

Mid Term exam

Final exam

Industrial attachment

Others (Specify)



54 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Q31. What are the percentage (number) student dropout rates over the last 
three years, for each of the following years of study?  _____________________

Year Male Female Total

Undergraduate programme

1st year

2nd year

3rd year

Masters programme

1st year

2nd year

PhD Programme

1st year

2nd year

3rd year

Q32. Does your institution facilitate evaluation by students of the teaching, 
research facilities, and university management? □ YES □ NO

Q33. If yes, what does your institution do with the outcomes of the evaluations? 
Please describe.



55AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Q34. Who designs or has authority to review curriculum in your institution?

Mark ‘X’ against the 
correct option

Any academic staff member, on his / her own

Curriculum Committee set up by the Faculty Board and or Senate, 
and made up of academics only.

Curriculum committees including representatives of business and 
industry

Curriculum specialists only

Vice Chancellor and Deans

Others (Specify)

Q35. Which of the following is/are true of the Curriculum of most of the 
programmes in your institutions?

Mark ‘X’ as 
appropriate

African -centred

Patterned after other African University

Patterned after other non-African University

Outcome Based learning

Subject specific competences emphasized

Generic competences or transferable skills emphasized

Promotes Student Learning, rather than staff- centred teaching

Other important characteristics (Specify)



56 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Q36. Which of the following trans-disciplinary/ cross-cutting areas are covered 
in the curriculum in your institution? (Rate from 1 = Weak to 5 = Very Strong for 
each)

Subject areas Rating Comments

Critical thinking

Independent learning

High order argumentation

Internationalization

Tolerance

African History

African Integration

Pan Africanism

Sustainable development

Gender sensitivity

National development

Others (Specify)



57AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

1.7 linkage with the industry sector

Q37. How would you rate the sufficiency of the following linkages with the 
industry sector in your institution? (Mark X as appropriate)

Excel-
lent

Good
Satisfac-
tory

Insuffi-
cient

Poor

Responsiveness of curricula to industry 
and employers’ participation in curricu-
lum design

Industrial placements and
practical trainings for students

Excel-
lent

Good
Satisfac-
tory

Insuffi-
cient

Poor

Links between the institution & potential 
employers to facilitate graduate employ-
ment

Data availability on graduation output and 
employment rate

Tracer studies/ survey of graduates and 
their employers

Collaborative research undertakings to 
solve industrial problems

1.8 research and community outreach

Q39. Indicate the number of patents, books and articles in academic journals 
published by staff in your institution over the past three years?

Year
Number of 

Patents
Number 
of Books

Number of academic 
articles in journals

No record (Mark 
‘X’ where applica-
ble)



58 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

Q40. What number of your institution’s staff members received national and 
international research awards over the past three years?

Year Number of national 
awards Number of International Awards

African Non-African

Q41. What is the total number and amount of research grants in your 
institution over the last three years?

Year
Number of Research 

Grants
Amount in US 

Dollars

National grants

Foreign grants

National grants

Foreign grants

National grants

Foreign grants

Q42. What is the total annual budget allocated to research in your institution, 
in the past 3 years? (In US Dollars)  

Year Amount (In US Dollars)



59AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Q43. In what type of geographic community is your institution located? 
(Please tick all that is applicable)  

Type Mark ‘X’ as appropriate

Urban

Rural

Peri-urban

Diverse

Other (specify)

Q44. How many community outreach programmes did your institution run 
over the past three years?  

Year Number of programmes

Q45. What are the main sources of funding currently available at your 
institution?

(Mark ‘X’ as 
appropriate)

Percentage contribution to your 
total annual funding

Public / Government

Private

Students School fees

Foreign support

Other source (specify)
The Church



60 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

1.9 internationalization

Q46. Does your institution have an International Office? X □ YES 
□ NO

If the answer is YES, which of the following describe the objectives of the office?

(i) Promoting international cooperation

(ii) Enhancing Intra-Africa mobility of students and staff

(iii) Managing the welfare and other needs of International Students

Q47. How many international students does your institution have? What 
percentage of the total is that?

•	 From countries in your geographic region

•	 From African countries outside your geographic region

•	 From outside Africa

Q48. How many international academic staff does your institution have?

Full-Time:  __________________  Part-Time:  __________



61AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

Chapter 7

 RATING QUESTIONNAIRES

1 GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT 

Rate the Governance and Management of your institution on the basis of the following 
standards by assigning an assessment value (0, 1, 2, 3, or 4) 

 0 = POOR         1 = INSUFFICIENT    2 = SATISFACTORY  

 3 = GOOD   4 = EXCELLENT 

Reference 
Number 

Standards for 
Quality Rating 

Assessment 
Value 1

Assessment 
Value 2

Assessment 
Value 3

Assessment 
Value 4

1.1 The institution 
has a clearly 
stated vision, mis-
sion, and values 
with specific goals 
and priorities.  

1.2 The institution 
has specific strat-
egies in place 
for monitoring 
achievement of 
institutional goals 
and identifying 
problem areas. 

1.3 Clear account-
ability structures 
for responsible 
officers are in 
place. 

1.4 Where appro-
priate, staff, stu-
dents and exter-
nal stakeholders 
are represented 
in governance 
structures. 
Governance 
structures are 
representative in 
terms of gender. 



62 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

1.5 The institution 
has developed 
quality assurance 
policies and pro-
cedures. 

1.6 Appropriate 
mechanisms 
are in place to 
evaluate staff 
in line with 
performance 
agreements 
with relevant 
authorities. 

1.7 The institution 
has put a man-
agement infor-
mation system in 
place to manage 
student and 
staff data, and 
to track student 
performance. 

1.8 The institution 
has specific 
policies in 
place to ensure 
and support 
diversity of staff 
and students, 
in particular 
representation 
of women and 
the disabled. 

1.9 The institution 
has a policy and 
standard proce-
dures in place to 
ensure staff and 
student welfare. 

Total Assessment Value 

Aggregated Value = Total Assessment 
Value = 9 



63AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

1. YOUR ANALYSIS AND SELF RATING OF GOVERNANCE AND 
MANAGEMENT

GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT - 1st Rating

Summary of Strengths and Areas for Improvement

 Strengths identified: ……………………………………………………………………
……………………………………………………………………………………………
……………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………...............………………………

Areas for improvement identified: ……………………….....…………………………
……………………………………………………………………………………………
……………………………………………………………………………………………
………………………………………………………………………….......……………

Recommendations: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT - 2nd Rating

Summary of Strengths and Areas for Improvement

 Strengths identified: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Areas for improvement identified: ………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Recommendations: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………



64 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT - 3rd Rating

Summary of Strengths and Areas for Improvement

 Strengths identified: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Areas for improvement identified: ……………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Recommendations: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

GOVERNANCE AND MANAGEMENT - 4th Rating

Summary of Strengths and Areas for Improvement

 Strengths identified: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Areas for improvement identified: ……………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Recommendations: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………



65AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

2 . INFRASTRUCTURE  AND FACILITIES

Rate the Infrastructure and facilities of your institution on the basis of the following stan-
dards by assigning an assessment value (0, 1, 2, 3, or 4) 

 0 = POOR         1 = INSUFFICIENT    2 = SATISFACTORY  

 3 = GOOD  4 = EXCELLENT 

Reference 
Point 

Standard 
for Quality 

Rating 

Assessment 
Value 1

Assessment 
Value 2

Assessment 
Value 3

Assessment 
Value 4

2.1 The institution 
has sufficient 
lecturing 
spaces to 
accommodate 
student num-
bers taking the 
institutional 
mode of 
delivery into 
account. 

2.2 The institution 
provides suffi-
cient learning/
studying space 
for students 
including 
access to elec-
tronic learning 
resources, as 
required for 
the institution-
al mode of 
delivery. 

2.3 Academic 
and Admin-
istrative Staff 
have access 
to computer 
resources and 
the internet. 



66 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

2.4 Students 
have access 
to computer 
resources and 
the internet at 
a level appro-
priate to the 
demands of 
the institution-
al mode of 
delivery. 

2.5 The institution 
has sufficient 
laboratory 
facilities to 
accommo-
date students 
in science 
programmes, 
taking institu-
tional mode of 
delivery into 
account. 

2.6 Laboratory 
equipment is up 
to date and well 
maintained. 

2.7 The institu-
tion invests in 
maintaining 
an up to date 
library to 
support aca-
demic learning 
and ensures 
that appro-
priate access 
mechanisms 
are available 
depending on 
the mode of 
delivery. 



67AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

2.8 The institu-
tion makes 
provision for 
managing and 
maintaining 
utilities and 
ensuring that 
appropriate 
safety mea-
sures are in 
place. 

Total Assessment Value 

Aggregated Value/ 8 = Total 
Assessment Value 

=

2. YOUR ANALYSIS AND SELF-RATING OF INFRASTRUCTURES AND FACILITIES

INFRASTRUCTURE AND FACILITIES - 1st Rating

Summary of Strengths and Areas for Improvement

 Strengths identified: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Areas for improvement identified: ……………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Recommendations: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………



68 OLUSOLA OYEWOLE

INFRASTRUCTURE AND FACILITIES - 2nd Rating

Summary of Strengths and Areas for Improvement

 Strengths identified: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Areas for improvement identified: ……………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Recommendations: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

INFRASTRUCTURE AND FACILITIES - 3rd Rating

Summary of Strengths and Areas for Improvement

 Strengths identified: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Areas for improvement identified: ……………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Recommendations: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………



69AFRICAN QUALITY RATING MECHANISMS (AQRM)

INFRASTRUCTURE AND FACILITIES – 4th Rating

Summary of Strengths and Areas for Improvement

 Strengths identified: ……………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Areas for improvement identified: ……………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………
…………………………………………………………………………………………

Recommendations: ……………………………………………………………